en: Fully recyclable packaging
de: Vollständig recycelbare Verpackung
es: Embalaje completamente reciclable
fr: Packaging entièrement recyclable
it: Imballaggio completamente riciclabile
ja: 完全にリサイクル可能な包装
ko: 완전 재활용 가능 포장재
nl: Volledig recyclebare verpakking
pt: Embalagem totalmente reciclável

en: Easily flammable
ar: قابل للاشتعال بسهولة
az: Asanlıqla alışan
bg: Лесно запалим
bn: সহজে দাহ্য
cs: Snadno hořlavé
da: Letantændelig
de: Leicht entflammbar
el: Εύφλεκτο
es: Fácilmente inflamable
et: Kergesti süttiv
fa: به راحتی قابل اشتعال
fi: Helposti syttyvä
fr: Facilement inflammable
ga: Inlasta go héasca
gu: સરળતાથી જ્વલનશીલ
he: דליק בקלות
hr: Lako zapaljivo
hu: Könnyen gyúlékony
id: Mudah terbakar
is: Eldfimt
it: Facilmente infiammabile
ja: 可燃性
ka: ადვილად აალებადი
kk: Оңай тұтанатын
km: ងាយឆេះ
kn: ಸುಲಭವಾಗಿ ಉರಿಯುವ
ko: 가연성
ky: Оңой күйүүчү
lt: Lengvai užsidegantis
lv: Viegli uzliesmojošs
ml: എളുപ്പത്തിൽ കത്തുന്ന
mn: Шатамхай
mr: सहजपणे ज्वलनशील
ms: Mudah terbakar
mt: Faċilment jaqbad
ne: सजिलै जल्ने
nl: Makkelijk ontvlambaar
no: Lettantennelig
or: ସହଜରେ ଜ୍ୱଳନଶୀଳ
pa: ਆਸਾਨੀ ਨਾਲ ਜਲਣਸ਼ੀਲ
pl: Łatwopalny
pt: Facilmente inflamável
ro: Ușor inflamabil
ru: Легковоспламеняющийся
si: පහසුවෙන් ගිනි ඇවිලෙන
sk: Ľahko horľavé
sl: Lahko vnetljivo
sq: Lehtësisht i ndezshëm
sr: Lako zapaljivo
sv: Lättantändlig
sw: Huwaka kwa urahisi
ta: எளிதில் தீப்பற்றக்கூடிய
te: సులభంగా మండే
tg: Ба осонӣ оташгиранда
th: ติดไฟง่าย
tk: Aňsatlyk bilen ot alýan
tl: Madaling magliyab
tr: Kolay alevlenir
uk: Легкозаймистий
uz: Oson yonuvchi
vi: Dễ cháy

en: Without phthalates, without phtalates, 0 phthalates
de: Ohne Phthalate
es: Sin ftalatos
fr: Sans phtalates, Sans phtalate, 0 phtalate, zero phtalate
it: Senza ftalati
ja: フタル酸エステル不使用
ko: 프탈레이트 없음
nl: Zonder ftalaten
pt: Sem ftalatos

en: No colorings, without colorings, no colourings, without colourings, no colour, no color
fr: Sans colorants, pas de colorants, 0 colorant, zero colorant

fr: Sans colorant de synthese, 0 colorant de synthese
de: Ohne synthetische Farbstoffe, 0 synthetische Farbstoffe
es: Sin colorante sintético, 0 colorante sintético
nl: Zonder synthetische kleurstoffen, 0 synthetische kleurstoffen

en: Without soap, soap free
de: Ohne Seife
es: Sin jabón
fr: Sans savon
it: Senza sapone
ja: 石鹸不使用
ko: 비누 없음
nl: Zonder zeep
pt: Sem sabão

en: Without perfume, no perfume, perfume free
da: Uden parfume, Uparfumeret, Parfumefri
de: Ohne Parfüm
es: Sin perfume
fr: Sans parfum
it: Senza profumo
ja: 無香料
ko: 향료 없음
nl: Zonder parfum
pt: Sem perfume
sv: Utan parfym, Oparfymerad, Parfymfri

en: Synthetic scent free, free from synthesis fragrance, synthesis fragrance free, free from synthetic fragrances, synthetic fragrances free
de: Ohne synthetischen Duft, frei von synthetischen Duftstoffen, synthetische Duftstoffe frei
es: Sin fragancia sintética, libre de fragancia de síntesis, sin fragancias sintéticas
fr: Sans parfum de synthèse
nl: Zonder synthetische geur, vrij van synthetische geurstoffen, synthetische geurstoffen vrij

en: Without phenoxyethanol, Phenoxyethanol free
ar: بدون فينوكسي إيثانول
az: Fenoksietanolsiz
bg: Без феноксиетанол
bn: ফেনক্সিইথানল ছাড়া
cs: Bez fenoxyethanolu
da: Uden phenoxyethanol
de: Ohne Phenoxyethanol
el: Χωρίς φαινοξυαιθανόλη
es: Sin fenoxietanol
et: Ilma fenoksüetanoolita
fa: بدون فنوکسی اتانول
fi: Ilman fenoksietanolia
fr: Sans phenoxyethanol
ga: Gan feinocsaeatánól
gu: ફેનોક્સાઇથેનોલ વગર
he: ללא פנוקסיאתנול
hr: Bez fenoksietanola
hu: Fenoxietanol nélkül
id: Tanpa fenoksietanol
is: Án fenoxýetanóls
it: Senza fenossietanolo
ja: フェノキシエタノール不使用
ka: ფენოქსიეთანოლის გარეშე
kk: Феноксиэтанолсыз
km: គ្មាន Phenoxyethanol
kn: ಫೆನಾಕ್ಸಿಥೆನಾಲ್ ಇಲ್ಲದೆ
ko: 페녹시에탄올 없음
ky: Феноксиэтанолсуз
lt: Be fenoksietanolio
lv: Bez fenoksietanola
ml: ഫെനോക്സി എത്തനോൾ ഇല്ലാതെ
mn: Феноксиэтанолгүй
mr: फेनोक्सीएथेनॉलशिवाय
ms: Tanpa fenoksietanol
mt: Mingħajr phenoxyethanol
ne: फेनोक्सीथेनोल बिना
nl: Zonder fenoxyethanol
no: Uten fenoksyetanol
or: ଫେନକ୍ସିଏଥାନୋଲ୍ ବିନା
pa: ਫੀਨੋਕਸਾਈਥੇਨੌਲ ਤੋਂ ਬਿਨਾਂ
pl: Bez fenoksyetanolu
pt: Sem fenoxietanol
ro: Fără fenoxietanol
ru: Без феноксиэтанола
si: ෆීනොක්සිඑතනෝල් රහිත
sk: Bez fenoxyetanolu
sl: Brez fenoksietanola
sq: Pa fenoksietanol
sr: Bez fenoksietanola
sv: Utan fenoxietanol
sw: Bila phenoxyethanol
ta: பீனாக்சிஎத்தனால் இல்லாமல்
te: ఫినోక్సిథనాల్ లేకుండా
tg: Бе феноксиэтанол
th: ไม่มีฟีโนซีเอทานอล
tk: Fenoksietanolsyz
tl: Walang phenoxyethanol
tr: Fenoksietanol olmadan
uk: Без феноксиетанолу
uz: Fenoksietanolsiz
vi: Không chứa phenoxyethanol

en: Without aluminium salts
ar: بدون أملاح الألومنيوم
az: Alüminium duzları olmadan
bg: Без алуминиеви соли
bn: অ্যালুমিনিয়াম লবণ ছাড়া
cs: Bez hlinitých solí
da: Uden aluminiumsalte
de: Ohne Aluminiumsalze
el: Χωρίς άλατα αλουμινίου
es: Sin sales de aluminio
et: Ilma alumiiniumisooladeta
fa: بدون نمک آلومینیوم
fi: Ilman alumiinisuoloja
fr: Sans sels d'aluminium
ga: Gan salainn alúmanaim
gu: એલ્યુમિનિયમ ક્ષાર વગર
he: ללא מלחי אלומיניום
hr: Bez aluminijevih soli
hu: Alumíniumsók nélkül
id: Tanpa garam aluminium
is: Án álsöltum
it: Senza Sali di alluminio
ja: アルミニウム塩不使用
ka: ალუმინის მარილების გარეშე
kk: Алюминий тұздарынсыз
km: គ្មានអំបិលអាលុយមីញ៉ូម
kn: ಅಲ್ಯೂಮಿನಿಯಂ ಲವಣಗಳಿಲ್ಲದೆ
ko: 알루미늄 염 없음
ky: Алюминий туздары жок
lt: Be aliuminio druskų
lv: Bez alumīnija sāļiem
ml: അലുമിനിയം ലവണങ്ങൾ ഇല്ലാതെ
mn: Хөнгөн цагааны давсгүй
mr: ॲल्युमिनियम लवणांशिवाय
ms: Tanpa garam aluminium
mt: Mingħajr imluħa tal-aluminju
ne: आल्मुनियम नुन बिना
nl: Zonder aluminiumzouten
no: Uten aluminiumsalter
or: ଆଲୁମିନିୟମ ଲବଣ ବିନା
pa: ਐਲੂਮੀਨੀਅਮ ਲੂਣ ਤੋਂ ਬਿਨਾਂ
pl: Bez soli glinu
pt: Sem sais de alumínio
ro: Fără săruri de aluminiu
ru: Без солей алюминия
si: ඇලුමිනියම් ලවණ රහිතයි
sk: Bez hliníkových solí
sl: Brez aluminijevih soli
sq: Pa kripëra alumini
sr: Bez aluminijumskih soli
sv: Utan aluminiumsalter
sw: Bila chumvi za alumini
ta: அலுமினிய உப்புகள் இல்லாமல்
te: అల్యూమినియం లవణాలు లేకుండా
tg: Бе намакҳои алюминий
th: ไม่มีเกลืออลูมิเนียม
tk: Alýumin duzlary ýok
tl: Walang mga asin ng aluminyo
tr: Alüminyum tuzları içermez
uk: Без солей алюмінію
uz: Alyuminiy tuzlarisiz
vi: Không chứa muối nhôm

en: Without silicon, Silicon free, Without silicone
ar: بدون سيليكون
az: Silikonsuz
bg: Без силикон
bn: সিলিকন ছাড়া
cs: Bez silikonu
da: Uden silikone
de: Ohne Silikon
el: Χωρίς σιλικόνη
es: Sin silicona
et: Ilma silikoonita
fa: بدون سیلیکون
fi: Ilman silikonia
fr: Sans silicone, 0 silicones, Sans silicones
ga: Gan sileacón
gu: સિલિકોન વગર
he: ללא סיליקון
hr: Bez silikona
hu: Szilikon nélkül
id: Tanpa silikon
is: Án silíkons
it: Senza silicone
ja: シリコン不使用
ka: სილიკონის გარეშე
kk: Силиконсыз
km: គ្មានស៊ីលីកូន
kn: ಸಿಲಿಕಾನ್ ಇಲ್ಲದೆ
ko: 실리콘 없음
ky: Силиконсуз
lt: Be silikono
lv: Bez silikona
ml: സിലിക്കൺ ഇല്ലാതെ
mn: Силиконгүй
mr: सिलिकॉनशिवाय
ms: Tanpa silikon
mt: Mingħajr silikon
ne: सिलिकन बिना
nl: Zonder silicone
no: Uten silikon
or: ସିଲିକନ୍ ବିନା
pa: ਸਿਲੀਕੋਨ ਤੋਂ ਬਿਨਾਂ
pl: Bez silikonu
pt: Sem silicone
ro: Fără silicon
ru: Без силикона
si: සිලිකන් රහිත
sk: Bez silikónu
sl: Brez silikona
sq: Pa silikon
sr: Bez silikona
sv: Utan silikon
sw: Bila silikoni
ta: சிலிகான் இல்லாமல்
te: సిలికాన్ లేకుండా
tg: Бе силикон
th: ไม่มีซิลิโคน
tk: Silikonsyz
tl: Walang silicone
tr: Silikonsuz
uk: Без силікону
uz: Silikonsiz
vi: Không chứa silicone

en: Without acetone
ar: بدون أسيتون
az: Asetonsuz
bg: Без ацетон
bn: অ্যাসিটোন ছাড়া
cs: Bez acetonu
da: Uden acetone
de: Ohne Aceton
el: Χωρίς ακετόνη
es: Sin acetona
et: Atsetoonivaba
fa: بدون استون
fi: Ilman asetonia
fr: Sans acétone
ga: Gan aicéatón
gu: એસિટોન વગર
he: ללא אצטון
hr: Bez acetona
hu: Aceton nélkül
id: Tanpa aseton
is: Án asetóns
it: Senza acetone
ja: アセトン不使用
ka: აცეტონის გარეშე
kk: Ацетонсыз
km: គ្មានអាសេតូន
kn: ಅಸಿಟೋನ್ ಇಲ್ಲದೆ
ko: 아세톤 없음
ky: Ацетонсуз
lt: Be acetono
lv: Bez acetona
ml: അസെറ്റോൺ ഇല്ലാതെ
mn: Ацетон байхгүй
mr: ऍसिटोनशिवाय
ms: Tanpa aseton
mt: Mingħajr aċetun
ne: एसीटोन बिना
nl: Zonder aceton
no: Uten aceton
or: ଏସିଟୋନ୍ ବିନା
pa: ਐਸੀਟੋਨ ਤੋਂ ਬਿਨਾਂ
pl: Bez acetonu
pt: Sem acetona
ro: Fără acetonă
ru: Без ацетона
si: ඇසිටෝන් රහිත
sk: Bez acetónu
sl: Brez acetona
sq: Pa aceton
sr: Bez acetona
sv: Utan aceton
sw: Bila asetoni
ta: அசிட்டோன் இல்லாமல்
te: ఎసిటోన్ లేకుండా
tg: Бе ацетон
th: ไม่มีอะซิโตน
tk: Asetonsyz
tl: Walang acetone
tr: Asetonsuz
uk: Без ацетону
uz: Acetonsiz
vi: Không chứa axeton

en: Condom compatible
de: Kondomfreundlich
es: Compatible con preservativos, Compatible con condones
fr: Compatible avec les preservatifs
it: Compatibile con i preservativi
ja: コンドームとの併用可
ko: 콘돔과 함께 사용 가능
nl: Condoomvriendelijk
pt: Compatível com preservativos

en: Without glycol ethers
ar: بدون إيثرات الجليكول
az: Qlikol efirləri olmadan
bg: Без гликолови естери
bn: গ্লাইকল ইথার ছাড়া
cs: Bez glykoléterů
da: Uden glycolethere
de: Ohne Glykolether
el: Χωρίς γλυκολαιθέρες
es: Sin éteres de glicol
et: Ilma glükoolieetriteta
fa: بدون اترهای گلیکول
fi: Ilman glykolieettereitä
fr: Sans ethers de glycol
ga: Gan éitear glycol
gu: ગ્લાયકોલ ઇથર્સ વગર
he: ללא אתרי גליקול
hr: Bez glikol etera
hu: Glikol-éterek nélkül
id: Tanpa eter glikol
is: Án glýkóletera
it: Senza eteri di glicole
ja: グリコールエーテル不使用
ka: გლიკოლის ეთერების გარეშე
kk: Гликоль эфирлерінсіз
km: គ្មាន glycol ethers
kn: ಗ್ಲೈಕಾಲ್ ಈಥರ್‌ಗಳಿಲ್ಲದೆ
ko: 글리콜 에테르 없음
ky: Гликол эфирлери жок
lt: Be glikolio eterių
lv: Bez glikola ēteriem
ml: ഗ്ലൈക്കോൾ ഈഥറുകൾ ഇല്ലാതെ
mn: Гликолийн эфиргүй
mr: ग्लायकोल इथरशिवाय
ms: Tanpa glikol eter
mt: Mingħajr eteri tal-glikol
ne: ग्लाइकोल ईथर बिना
nl: Zonder glycolethers
no: Uten glykoletere
or: ଗ୍ଲାଇକଲ୍ ଇଥର ବିନା
pa: ਗਲਾਈਕੋਲ ਈਥਰ ਤੋਂ ਬਿਨਾਂ
pl: Bez eterów glikolowych
pt: Sem éteres de glicol
ro: Fără eteri glicolici
ru: Без гликолевых эфиров
si: ග්ලයිකෝල් ඊතර් නොමැතිව
sk: Bez glykoléterov
sl: Brez glikol etrov
sq: Pa eterë glikoli
sr: Bez glikol etara
sv: Utan glykoletrar
sw: Bila ethers za glikoli
ta: கிளைகோல் ஈதர்கள் இல்லாமல்
te: గ్లైకాల్ ఈథర్‌లు లేకుండా
tg: Бе эфирҳои гликол
th: ไม่มีไกลคอลอีเทอร์
tk: Glikol efirleri bolmazdan
tl: Walang glycol ethers
tr: Glikol eterleri olmadan
uk: Без гліколевих ефірів
uz: Glikol efirlarisiz
vi: Không có glycol ete

en: Without formaldehyde
ar: بدون الفورمالديهايد
az: Formaldehidsiz
bg: Без формалдехид
bn: ফর্মালডিহাইড ছাড়া
cs: Bez formaldehydu
da: Uden formaldehyd
de: Ohne Formaldehyd
el: Χωρίς φορμαλδεΰδη
es: Sin formaldehído
et: Ilma formaldehüüdita
fa: بدون فرمالدئید
fi: Ilman formaldehydiä
fr: Sans formaldehyde
ga: Gan formaildéad
gu: ફોર્માલ્ડીહાઈડ વગર
he: ללא פורמלדהיד
hr: Bez formaldehida
hu: Formaldehid nélkül
id: Tanpa formaldehida
is: Án formaldehýðs
it: Senza formaldeide
ja: ホルムアルデヒド不使用
ka: ფორმალდეჰიდის გარეშე
kk: Формальдегидсіз
km: គ្មានសារធាតុ Formaldehyde
kn: ಫಾರ್ಮಾಲ್ಡಿಹೈಡ್ ಇಲ್ಲದೆ
ko: 포름알데히드 없음
ky: Формальдегидсиз
lt: Be formaldehido
lv: Bez formaldehīda
ml: ഫോർമാൽഡിഹൈഡ് ഇല്ലാതെ
mn: Формальдегидгүй
mr: फॉर्मल्डिहाइडशिवाय
ms: Tanpa formaldehid
mt: Mingħajr formaldehyde
ne: फॉर्मल्डिहाइड बिना
nl: Zonder formaldehyde
no: Uten formaldehyd
or: ଫର୍ମାଲଡିହାଇଡ୍ ବିନା
pa: ਫਾਰਮਲਡੀਹਾਈਡ ਤੋਂ ਬਿਨਾਂ
pl: Bez formaldehydu
pt: Sem formaldeído
ro: Fără formaldehidă
ru: Без формальдегида
si: ෆෝමල්ඩිහයිඩ් රහිත
sk: Bez formaldehydu
sl: Brez formaldehida
sq: Pa formaldehid
sr: Bez formaldehida
sv: Utan formaldehyd
sw: Bila formaldehyde
ta: பார்மால்டிஹைடு இல்லாமல்
te: ఫార్మాల్డిహైడ్ లేకుండా
tg: Бе формальдегид
th: ไม่มีสารฟอร์มาลดีไฮด์
tk: Formaldegitsiz
tl: Walang formaldehyde
tr: Formaldehit içermez
uk: Без формальдегіду
uz: Formaldegidsiz
vi: Không chứa formaldehyde

en: Sulfate free, No sulfate, Without sulfate
ar: بدون كبريتات
az: Sulfatsız
bg: Без сулфати
bn: সালফেট মুক্ত
cs: Bez sulfátů
da: Uden sulfater
de: Ohne Sulfate
el: Χωρίς θειικά άλατα
es: Sin sulfatos
et: Sulfaadivaba
fa: بدون سولفات
fi: Sulfaatiton
fr: Sans sulfates, Sans sulphates
ga: Saor ó shulfáit
gu: સલ્ફેટ મુક્ત
he: ללא סולפט
hr: Bez sulfata
hu: Szulfátmentes
id: Bebas sulfat
is: Súlfatlaust
it: Senza solfati
ja: 硫酸塩フリー
ka: სულფატების გარეშე
kk: Сульфатсыз
km: គ្មានស៊ុលហ្វាត
kn: ಸಲ್ಫೇಟ್ ಮುಕ್ತ
ko: 황산염 없음
ky: Сульфатсыз
lt: Be sulfatų
lv: Bez sulfātiem
ml: സൾഫേറ്റ് രഹിതം
mn: Сульфатгүй
mr: सल्फेट मुक्त
ms: Bebas sulfat
mt: Ħieles mis-sulfat
ne: सल्फेट मुक्त
nl: Zonder sulfaten
no: Uten sulfater
or: ସଲଫେଟ୍ ମୁକ୍ତ
pa: ਸਲਫੇਟ ਮੁਕਤ
pl: Bez siarczanów
pt: Sem sulfatos
ro: Fără sulfați
ru: Без сульфатов
si: සල්ෆේට් රහිත
sk: Bez sulfátov
sl: Brez sulfatov
sq: Pa sulfate
sr: Bez sulfata
sv: Utan sulfater
sw: Haina salfati
ta: சல்பேட் இல்லாதது
te: సల్ఫేట్ లేనిది
tg: Бе сулфатҳо
th: ไม่มีซัลเฟต
tk: Sulfatsyz
tl: Walang sulfate
tr: Sülfatsız
uk: Без сульфатів
uz: Sulfatsiz
vi: Không chứa sulfat

en: Without ammonia
de: Ohne Ammoniak
es: Sin amoníaco
fr: Sans ammoniaque
it: Senza ammoniaca
ja: アンモニアフリー
ko: 암모니아 없음
nl: Zonder ammoniak
pt: Sem amônia

en: Without ammonium
fr: Sans ammonium

en: Without triclosan, Triclosan free, No triclosan
de: Ohne Triclosan
es: Sin triclosán
fr: Sans triclosan
it: Senza triclosan
ja: トリクロサン不使用
ko: 트리클로산 없음
nl: Zonder triclosan
pt: Sem triclosan

en: Without mineral oil, Mineral oil free, No mineral oil
de: Ohne Mineralöl
es: Sin aceite mineral
fr: Sans huile minérale
it: Senza olio minerale
ja: ミネラルオイル不使用
ko: 미네랄 오일 없음
nl: Zonder minerale olie
pt: Sem óleo mineral